trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="gupp/y__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yn</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yer</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yerna</l>     <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iesarna</l>   <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="halvankar/e__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tyg__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="get__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>terna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="aorta__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="u__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cyklame/n__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vi__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sedativ/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jitterbug__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="toff/el__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eln</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lor</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lorna</l>     <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="rispapp/er__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ret</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eret</l>      <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="and/ur__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ur</l>        <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uren</l>      <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urn</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dummy">           <i>dumm</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mönstergarn">     <i>mönstergarn</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="allergen">        <i>allergen</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gelänk">          <i>gelänk</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tillväxthormon">  <i>tillväxthormon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ponny">           <i>ponn</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gryn">            <i>gryn</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="halvankare">      <i>halvankar</i><par n="halvankar/e__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="dinatriumvätefosfat"><i>dinatriumvätefosfat</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="cyklamen">        <i>cyklame</i><par n="cyklame/n__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ättled">          <i>ättled</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="shetlandsponny">  <i>shetlandsponn</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="könshormon">      <i>könshormon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sköldkörtelhormon"><i>sköldkörtelhormon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sedativum">       <i>sedativ</i><par n="sedativ/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="akrostikon">      <i>akrostikon</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="u">               <i>u</i><par n="u__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dandy">           <i>dand</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vant">            <i>vant</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="försäljningsled"> <i>försäljningsled</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="predikament">     <i>predikament</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="guppy">           <i>gupp</i><par n="gupp/y__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="rekvisit">        <i>rekvisit</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fibrin">          <i>fibrin</i><par n="tyg__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="pinjenöt">        <i>pinjenöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="alpget">          <i>alpget</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="schweizernöt">    <i>schweizernöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="stenget">         <i>stenget</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="jordnöt">         <i>jordnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dubbelnöt">       <i>dubbelnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="benget">          <i>benget</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="betelnöt">        <i>betelnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="valnöt">          <i>valnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pekannöt">        <i>pekannöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="get">             <i>get</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kokosnöt">        <i>kokosnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="hasselnöt">       <i>hasselnöt</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="råget">           <i>råget</i><par n="get__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="andur">           <i>and</i><par n="and/ur__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="toffel">          <i>toff</i><par n="toff/el__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="filttoffel">      <i>filttoff</i><par n="toff/el__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="trätoffel">       <i>trätoff</i><par n="toff/el__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kalvkött">        <i>kalvkött</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="höstrusk">        <i>höstrusk</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gråpapper">       <i>gråpapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tidningspapper">  <i>tidningspapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kvalm">           <i>kvalm</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="grannelag">       <i>grannelag</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="aorta">           <i>aorta</i><par n="aorta__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dokumentpapper">  <i>dokumentpapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kraftpapper">     <i>kraftpapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tvåskift">        <i>tvåskift</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="lumppapper">      <i>lumppapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="thomasfosfat">    <i>thomasfosfat</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="granulom">        <i>granulom</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="smörgåspapper">   <i>smörgåspapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="peneplan">        <i>peneplan</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hushållspapper">  <i>hushållspapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="smörpapper">      <i>smörpapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="toalettpapper">   <i>toalettpapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tandem">          <i>tandem</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="spöregn">         <i>spöregn</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="toapapper">       <i>toapapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="jitterbug">       <i>jitterbug</i><par n="jitterbug__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="misshag">         <i>misshag</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gurkmejpapper">   <i>gurkmejpapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="elfenbenspapper"> <i>elfenbenspapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tonval">          <i>tonval</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dasspapper">      <i>dasspapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="snicksnack">      <i>snicksnack</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="klink">           <i>klink</i><par n="vi__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="rispapper">       <i>rispapp</i><par n="rispapp/er__n_nt"/></e>
